Tennessee, session 114, SB1694.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-1-106(a)(2)(A), is amended by
deleting "thirty (30) days" and substituting "thirty (30) business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1694
010487
- 1 -